Montana, session 2025, HB772.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 27-26-201, MCA, is amended to read:
"27-26-201. Application for writ. The writ must be issued upon on affidavit, on the application of the
party beneficially interested, when the criteria established in 27-19-201 have been met."

Section 2. Section 27-26-203, MCA, is amended to read:
"27-26-203. Form and content of writ. The writ may be either alternative or peremptory. The
alternative writ must state generally the allegation against the party to whom it is directed and command the
party, immediately after the receipt of the writ or at some other specified time, to do the act required to be
performed or to show cause appear with all parties before the court, at a specified time and place, why the
party has not done so to address the merits of the writ. The peremptory writ must be in a similar form, except
that the words requiring the party to show cause why the party has not done as commanded appear with all
parties to address the merits of the writ must be omitted and a return day inserted."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 772